Nevada, session 83, SB162.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 353 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. As a condition of the acceptance of an appropriation of
state money, an entity must agree to comply with any civil rights or
employment laws applicable to the entity, including, without
limitation, such laws that contain protections against retaliation
for employees who seek to enforce, administer or otherwise
promote compliance with the law.
2. The acceptance of state money by an entity is deemed
the agreement by the entity to the conditions prescribed by
subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Civil rights or employment laws” means any state or
federal law which prohibits discrimination because of race, creed,
color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or
expression, age or disability. The term includes, without
limitation:
(1) Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §§
2000e et seq.;
(2) The Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967, 29
U.S.C. §§ 621-634;
(3) The Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C.
§§ 12101 et seq.; and
(4) NRS 613.310 to 613.4383, inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) “State money” does not include money which is received by
this State from the Federal Government for distribution and use in
this State pursuant to federal law or federal regulation.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)